Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-1126
State and governmental agencies; suits against.

The state and governmental agencies created by the state may be sued upon claims arising under the Nebraska Fair Employment Practice Act in the same manner as provided by such law for suits against other employers.

Laws 1979, LB 67, § 2;

Laws 1983, LB 447, § 74.

Nebraska Fair Employment Practice Act, see section 48-1125.